Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.12
Commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances; rules and regulations.

For the enforcement of the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act, the director is authorized to prescribe rules and regulations, after public hearing following due public notice, relating to the distribution of commercial fertilizers and beneficial substances as he or she may find necessary to carry into effect the full intent and meaning of the act.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 12, p. 1044;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 13;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 32;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 20.
March 17, 2026